Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,229
Lights, red or green, in front of vehicle prohibited; exceptions.

Except as provided in sections 60-6,230 to 60-6,233, it shall be unlawful for any person to drive or move any vehicle upon a highway with any red or green light thereon visible from directly in front thereof. This section shall not apply to police or fire department or fire patrol vehicles or school buses.

Laws 1931, c. 110, § 49, p. 323;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1180;

R.S.1943, § 39-788;

Laws 1969, c. 327, § 1, p. 1170;

C.S.Supp.,1972, § 39-788;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,147;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 325.